Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2730
Payment to designated agent.

Subject to the provisions of section 30-2732, a financial institution, on request of an agent under an agency designation for an account, may pay to the agent sums on deposit in the account, whether or not a party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when the request is made or received, and whether or not the authority of the agent terminates on the disability or incapacity of a party.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 16.